Maryland, session 2026, SB0539.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE WORKFORCE OPPORTUNITIES GRANT FUND.
Article – State Government
9–4103.
(a) The purpose of the Department is to:
(1) provide support for units of State government, individuals, and
businesses for the maintenance of social equity policies in the State;
(2) monitor trends in social equity programs and policies across the nation;

SENATE BILL 539 3
(3) propose new and innovative approaches to social equity programs;
(4) compile and produce reports and recommendations related to social
equity;
(5) ensure the fulfillment of the roles and responsibilities of the entities
and social equity programs in the State for which it is the successor;
(6) track the performance of social equity programs and small or
disadvantaged business assistance programs;
(7) promote and encourage full participation in the regulated cannabis
industry by individuals from communities that have previously been disproportionately
impacted by the war on drugs in order to positively impact those communities and other
duties assigned to the Office of Social Equity established under this subtitle;
(8) support small or disadvantaged businesses in the State through all
duties assigned to the [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs;
[and]
(9) carry out the duties of the Office of Minority Business Enterprises
within the Maryland Department of Transportation, including duties assigned to support
small or disadvantaged businesses; AND
(10) OVERSEE AND ADMINISTER THE WORKFORCE OPPORTUNITIES
GRANT PROGRAM AND WORKFORCE OPPORTUNITIES GRANT FUND.
(b) The Department shall:
(1) connect a person with programs in State, federal, and local government
that serve designated populations to ensure the person is connected to programs and other
opportunities the person is eligible for;
(2) provide units of State government with assistance related to the
purpose of the Department by:
(i) facilitating information sharing between units;
(ii) maintaining an inventory of social equity work performed by
each unit and relevant reports from those units;
(iii) conducting policy analyses on social equity and the effectiveness
of social equity programs;
(iv) adopting standards for units to promote social equity; and

SENATE BILL 539
(v) providing technical assistance to units; and
(3) adopt regulations to carry out this subtitle.
9–4123. RESERVED.
9–4124. RESERVED.
PART IV. WORKFORCE OPPORTUNITIES GRANT PROGRAM.
9–4125.
(A) IN THIS PART THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “FUND” MEANS THE WORKFORCE OPPORTUNITIES GRANT FUND.
(C) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE WORKFORCE OPPORTUNITIES GRANT
PROGRAM.
9–4126.
(A) THERE IS A WORKFORCE OPPORTUNITIES GRANT PROGRAM IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO SUPPORT
THE PLANNING AND EXECUTION OF WORKFORCE EVENTS AND JOB FAIRS IN THE
STATE THAT CONNECT JOB SEEKERS WITH EMPLOYERS.
9–4127.
(A) SUBJECT TO THE AVAILABILITY OF FUNDING FOR THE PROGRAM, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH AN APPLICATION PROCESS THAT AWARDS GRANTS
ON A COMPETITIVE BASIS TO NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS, LOCAL WORKFORCE
BOARDS, AND PARTNERSHIPS THAT INCLUDE EMPLOYERS, COMMUNITY
ORGANIZATIONS, AND OTHER STAKEHOLDERS THAT:
(1) REGULARLY WORK WITH SMALL AND LARGE EMPLOYERS FROM
MULTIPLE INDUSTRIES AND REGIONS ACROSS THE STATE;

SENATE BILL 539 5
(2) CAN CONDUCT WORKFORCE EVENTS OR JOB FAIRS IN MULTIPLE
REGIONS OF THE STATE THAT ARE ACCESSIBLE TO JOB SEEKERS AND EMPLOYERS;
(3) HAVE EXPERIENCE ORGANIZING EVENTS AND WORKING WITH
EMPLOYERS WHO HAVE THE ABILITY TO HIRE JOB SEEKERS; AND
(4) HAVE THE CAPACITY TO CONNECT JOB SEEKERS DIRECTLY WITH
EMPLOYERS FROM MULTIPLE INDUSTRIES.
(B) AN ORGANIZATION THAT IS AWARDED A GRANT UNDER THE PROGRAM
MAY USE THE FUNDS FOR:
(1) OUTREACH;
(2) LOGISTICS;
(3) VENUES;
(4) SUPPORT SERVICES;
(5) STAFFING; AND
(6) EVENT COORDINATION.
9–4128.
(A) THERE IS A WORKFORCE OPPORTUNITIES GRANT FUND.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO SUPPORT THE PROGRAM.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(2) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND

SENATE BILL 539
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR PROGRAM PURPOSES.
(G) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO THE
FUND.
(H) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND IN
THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(J) FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2028 THROUGH 2030, THE GOVERNOR
SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF AT LEAST
$500,000 FOR THE FUND.
9–4129.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2028, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT ON THE PROGRAM TO THE GOVERNOR AND,
IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(B) THE REPORT SUBMITTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) THE NUMBER AND LOCATION OF EVENTS HELD USING GRANT
FUNDS AWARDED UNDER THE PROGRAM;
(2) THE NUMBER OF EMPLOYERS AND JOB SEEKERS PARTICIPATING
IN EVENTS SUPPORTED BY GRANT FUNDS AWARDED UNDER THE PROGRAM; AND
(3) DATA ON JOB PLACEMENTS AND HIRES RESULTING FROM EVENTS
SUPPORTED BY GRANT FUNDS AWARDED UNDER THE PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of September
30, 2031, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.